North Carolina, session 2025, SB1054.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new Part to read:
"Part 10D. Child and Adult Care Food Program (CACFP) for Child Care Providers.
"§ 143B-168.40. CACFP Access for Family, Friend, and Neighbor Child Care Providers.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) CACFP. – The Child and Adult Care Food Program, as authorized under
Section 17 of the National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1766, and
administered in this State by the Division of Child Development and Early
Education (DCDEE) within the Department of Health and Human Services.
(2) Family, friend, and neighbor (FFN) child care provider. – An individual who
is legally operating under applicable State law and provides child care,
including child care in one of the following settings:
a. An operator-occupied private dwelling in which, at any one time, two
or less children receive child care.
*S1054-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. The home of any child receiving child care if all of the children in child
care are related to one another and no more than two additional
children are in child care.
The term includes individuals providing (i) child care that falls below the
threshold requiring licensure under G.S. 110-86(3)b., (ii) arrangements
excluded from the definition of child care under G.S. 110-86(2), and (iii) child
care holding a license-exempt status recognized by the Department.
(b) Requirements. – The Department shall take all feasible administrative action to
extend access to CACFP to legally operating FFN child care providers, which action may include,
but is not limited to, the following:
(1) Identifying and engaging or designating one or more sponsoring organizations
capable of administering CACFP reimbursements to FFN providers.
(2) Developing or modifying application procedures, training requirements, and
record-keeping protocols appropriate to the scale and nature of FFN care
settings.
(3) Applying for any available federal waivers, pilot programs, or flexibilities that
support FFN provider participation in CACFP.
(4) Establishing simplified or tiered compliance mechanisms to reduce
administrative burden on FFN providers while maintaining program integrity.
(c) Reporting. – No later than July 1 of each year, the Department shall submit a report
to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal
Research Division of the General Assembly detailing each of the following:
(1) The number of FFN providers enrolled in or newly accessing CACFP.
(2) The number of children served through FFN providers participating in
CACFP.
(3) Any barriers to participation identified and steps taken to address them.
(4) Recommendations for additional legislative or administrative action.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any FFN provider to participate
in CACFP, to alter the licensure requirements of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes, or to
conflict with applicable federal law or USDA regulations governing CACFP."
SECTION 2. Implementation Plan. – No later than 180 days after this act becomes
effective, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and
Early Education, shall develop and publish an implementation plan detailing the administrative
approach selected pursuant to G.S. 143B-168.40(b), as enacted in Section 1 of this act, including
timelines, required rule changes, any necessary federal approvals, and resource requirements.
SECTION 3. Report. – The Division of Child Development and Early Education
shall submit its initial report required by G.S. 143B-168.40(c), as enacted by Section 1 of this
act, no later than 12 months from the date this act becomes effective.
SECTION 4.(a) Appropriations. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early
Education, the following amounts for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, for the following purposes:
(1) The sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to do each of the following:
a. Develop the implementation plan required by Section 2 of this act,
including identification of feasible administrative approaches to
extending Child and Adult Care Food Program (CACFP) access to
legally operating family, friend, and neighbor (FFN) child care
providers, assessment of required federal approvals or State plan
amendments, and determination of resource requirements necessary to
carry out the selected approach.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1054-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Conduct outreach to existing and potential CACFP sponsoring
organizations to assess capacity and willingness to administer CACFP
reimbursements on behalf of FFN providers, and to identify gaps in
sponsoring organization coverage across the State, with particular
attention to rural areas and communities with high concentrations of
FFN care arrangements.
c. Design and pilot FFN-appropriate application procedures, training
curricula, and record-keeping protocols that reduce administrative
burden on FFN providers while maintaining compliance with
applicable federal program integrity requirements.
d. Apply for any available federal waivers, pilot programs, or flexibilities
offered by the United States Department of Agriculture, Food and
Nutrition Service, that would support or accelerate FFN provider
participation in CACFP, including preparation of any required state
plan amendments.
(2) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in recurring funds
beginning in the 2025-2026 fiscal year to support the ongoing administrative
costs of coordinating FFN provider participation in CACFP in accordance
with this act, including the hiring of full-time staff to assist with processing
and outreach of applications, staff time dedicated to sponsoring organization
oversight, FFN provider support, data collection, and preparation of the annual
report required under G.S. 143B-168.40(c), as enacted in Section 1 of this act.
Funding shall continue until such time as federal CACFP administrative
reimbursements are sufficient to cover those costs, at which point the Division
of Child Development and Early Education shall notify the Office of State
Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division and the recurring
appropriation under this subdivision shall be reduced accordingly.
SECTION 4.(b) Funds appropriated under subsection (a) of this section shall not
revert to the General Fund at the end of the fiscal year but shall remain available for the purposes
of that subsection until expended or until June 30 of the second fiscal year following
appropriation, whichever occurs first.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 1054-First Edition Page 3